District of Columbia statutes.
7-1671.07

Board of Medicine review of medical marijuana physician recommendations.

(a)

The Board of Medicine shall have the authority to review and audit the written physician recommendations submitted to the Department as part of the registration process and shall have the authority to discipline physicians who act outside of the scope of this chapter.

(b)

The Board of Medicine shall audit the recommendations submitted by any physician who provides more than 250 recommendations in any 12-month period to patients for the use of medical marijuana.

(c)

Submitting a false statement regarding a qualifying patient’s eligibility to participate in the Program on the form developed pursuant to § 7-1761.04(b)(2) shall be grounds for the revocation, suspension, or denial of a license to practice medicine or osteopathy, or the imposition of a civil fine pursuant to § 3-1205.14(c), or both.

Feb. 25, 2010, D.C. Law 13-315, § 8
as added July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-210, § 2, 57 DCR 4798
This section is referenced in § 3-1202.03 and § 7-1671.04.